Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.315

Subscription offering—Distribution of order forms for the purchase of shares.

Promptly after the director has declared the offering circular for the subscription offering effective, the applicant shall distribute order forms for the purchase of shares of capital stock in the subscription offering to all eligible account holders, supplemental eligible account holders (if applicable), and other persons who may subscribe for the shares under the plan of conversion.

[ 1994 c 92 s 381; 1981 c 85 s 62.]